src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxDu3: теневабтиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl1: теневабˮнаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl2: теневабтаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxPl3: теневабтоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1.2: теневабˮни
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg1: [теневабаˮн, теневабˮни]
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg2: теневабат
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮ1+PxSg3: теневабта
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu1: теневабˮнаниʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu2: теневабˮнандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxDu3: теневабˮнандиʼ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl1: теневабˮнанаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl2: теневабˮнандаˮ
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxPl3: теневабˮнандоʼ
#     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg1.2: теневабˮнани
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg1: [теневабˮнан, теневабˮнани]
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg2: теневабˮнанд
     теневась+V+TV+Subord/бˮна2+PxSg3: теневабˮнанда
